Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-217.01
Qualifying nonprofit organization, defined.

(1) Qualifying nonprofit organization, for the purpose of special event bingo, shall mean a nonprofit organization:

(a) Which holds a certificate of exemption under section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code or the major activities of which, exclusive of conducting gaming activities regulated under Chapter 9, are conducted for charitable or community betterment purposes; and

(b) Which has been in existence in this state for a period of at least five years immediately preceding its application for a permit.

(2) Qualifying nonprofit organization shall not mean or include any organization which holds a license pursuant to the Nebraska Bingo Act.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 21;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 6.